noun/enhuoaee2.lexc
!!!enhuoa.-> enhuoaee .lexc!!!
!!! EetoePP does é->e here
!!! UutouPP3 does ú->u here, etc...
!!! Some of the words here are also in enhuoaeejaje, and get
!! also plural poss jaje like útjaim
!!!
!! Az itt szereplő szavak anhuoaee-ben vannak ragozva
!! ez csak tárgyesetet állít elő bizonyosakra
!!
!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun
  
!+Posss3p +Possp3p +Possp2p +Posss1s +Possp3s +Posss2p
!+Possp1p +Posss1p  +Posss3s +Possp2s +Posss2s +Possp1s 

!+Fam  +Genpl +Plur +Gens
+Acc

!+Sub +Fac +Ill +Dat +Dis +Del +Soc +Ine +Sup +Ela +Ess
!+All +Ter +Cau +Nom +Forpen +Abl +Ade +Tem +Ins +For +Forp  

§oeoez43§ 
      
LEXICON Root
Noun ;

!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;

LEXICON AddNoun
+Noun:0     Case;
 
LEXICON Case
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez43§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t

LEXICON Noun
Csíkszépvíz AddNoun;
Fehérvíz AddNoun;
Feketevíz AddNoun;
Galgahévíz AddNoun;
Hosszúvíz AddNoun;
Hévíz AddNoun;
Kelevíz AddNoun;
Maroshévíz AddNoun;
Olthévíz AddNoun;
Szépvíz AddNoun;
ablakmosóvíz AddNoun;
acéldarázs AddNoun;
agyagdarázs AddNoun;
agyagkéz AddNoun;
agyvíz AddNoun;
alapvíz AddNoun;
algamész AddNoun;
algavíz AddNoun;
aljvíz AddNoun;
alsóvíz AddNoun;
altalajvíz AddNoun;
alvíz AddNoun;
angyalkéz AddNoun;
anyagcserevíz AddNoun;
anyakéz AddNoun;
anyavíz AddNoun;
apakéz AddNoun;
apályvíz AddNoun;
aranyparázs AddNoun;
aranyvíz AddNoun;
arcvíz AddNoun;
aromavíz AddNoun;
artézivíz AddNoun;
asszonykéz AddNoun;
autóhűtővíz AddNoun;
autószervíz AddNoun;
babakéz AddNoun;
babavíz AddNoun;
bajnokkéz AddNoun;
balkéz AddNoun;
banyavíz AddNoun;
baritvíz AddNoun;
barlangvíz AddNoun;
barlangászkéz AddNoun;
befogadóvíz AddNoun;
belvíz AddNoun;
berekvíz AddNoun;
bográcsvíz AddNoun;
borogatóvíz AddNoun;
borotvavíz AddNoun;
borsmentavíz AddNoun;
borvíz AddNoun;
borászkéz AddNoun;
botkéz AddNoun;
brakkvíz AddNoun;
brókerkéz AddNoun;
brómvíz AddNoun;
buzivíz AddNoun;
bádogkéz AddNoun;
bányamész AddNoun;
bányavíz AddNoun;
békakéz AddNoun;
bíborparázs AddNoun;
bóraxmész AddNoun;
bórvíz AddNoun;
böffentővíz AddNoun;
búvárvíz AddNoun;
bűvészkéz AddNoun;
cementréz AddNoun;
cementvíz AddNoun;
cigarettaparázs AddNoun;
ciszternavíz AddNoun;
citromvíz AddNoun;
csapadékvíz AddNoun;
csapvíz AddNoun;
csarnokvíz AddNoun;
csatornaszennyvíz AddNoun;
csatornavíz AddNoun;
cselédész AddNoun;
csendőrkéz AddNoun;
csepegővíz AddNoun;
cseresznyevíz AddNoun;
cserevíz AddNoun;
csermelyvíz AddNoun;
cserparázs AddNoun;
csillagvíz AddNoun;
csirkeész AddNoun;
csodavíz AddNoun;
csontkéz AddNoun;
csontmész AddNoun;
csontvázkéz AddNoun;
csuromvíz AddNoun;
császárvíz AddNoun;
csúcsvíz AddNoun;
cukorvíz AddNoun;
cukrosvíz AddNoun;
célzóvíz AddNoun;
dagályvíz AddNoun;
dajkakéz AddNoun;
darázs AddNoun;
dauervíz AddNoun;
divatvíz AddNoun;
diákkéz AddNoun;
diákész AddNoun;
dobozkéz AddNoun;
dobókéz AddNoun;
dohányparázs AddNoun;
drótkéz AddNoun;
dunnavíz AddNoun;
durvamész AddNoun;
dögvíz AddNoun;
ecsetvíz AddNoun;
edzővíz AddNoun;
elektrolitréz AddNoun;
emberkéz AddNoun;
emberész AddNoun;
ereszvíz AddNoun;
erotikavíz AddNoun;
erővíz AddNoun;
esővíz AddNoun;
etetővíz AddNoun;
eukaliptuszparázs AddNoun;
ezredkéz AddNoun;
ezüstvíz AddNoun;
facsaróvíz AddNoun;
fadarázs AddNoun;
fakadóvíz AddNoun;
fakátrányvíz AddNoun;
fakéz AddNoun;
fantomkéz AddNoun;
faparázs AddNoun;
farvíz AddNoun;
faszénparázs AddNoun;
fedővíz AddNoun;
fehérmész AddNoun;
fehérréz AddNoun;
fejlesztőkéz AddNoun;
fejvíz AddNoun;
felhévíz AddNoun;
felmosóvíz AddNoun;
feloldóvíz AddNoun;
felvíz AddNoun;
fenyődarázs AddNoun;
fenékvíz AddNoun;
festővíz AddNoun;
fiúkéz AddNoun;
fogmosóvíz AddNoun;
foltvíz AddNoun;
folyóvíz AddNoun;
forrasztóvíz AddNoun;
forrázóvíz AddNoun;
félkéz AddNoun;
félész AddNoun;
fémkéz AddNoun;
férfikéz AddNoun;
fügedarázs AddNoun;
fürdetővíz AddNoun;
fürkészdarázs AddNoun;
fürösztővíz AddNoun;
fővíz AddNoun;
fűtővíz AddNoun;
gazdakéz AddNoun;
gipszkéz AddNoun;
gleccservíz AddNoun;
gubacsdarázs AddNoun;
gyerekkéz AddNoun;
gyerekész AddNoun;
gyermekész AddNoun;
gyémántkéz AddNoun;
gyógyforrásvíz AddNoun;
gyógyvíz AddNoun;
gyöngyvíz AddNoun;
gyümölcsvíz AddNoun;
gázlóvíz AddNoun;
gépdarázs AddNoun;
hajtóvíz AddNoun;
hajószennyvíz AddNoun;
halálkéz AddNoun;
halászóvíz AddNoun;
haramiakéz AddNoun;
harmatvíz AddNoun;
haszonvíz AddNoun;
hegyvíz AddNoun;
hidegvíz AddNoun;
holdvíz AddNoun;
holtvíz AddNoun;
honfiész AddNoun;
horgászvíz AddNoun;
hálózatvíz AddNoun;
hévíz AddNoun;
hígítóvíz AddNoun;
hóvíz AddNoun;
hőforrásvíz AddNoun;
hűtővíz AddNoun;
ikerparázs AddNoun;
iparművészkéz AddNoun;
iszapolóvíz AddNoun;
itatóvíz AddNoun;
izzadmányvíz AddNoun;
jobbkéz AddNoun;
juramész AddNoun;
jégvíz AddNoun;
kagylómész AddNoun;
kalózkéz AddNoun;
kanyonvíz AddNoun;
kapillárisvíz AddNoun;
karbidmész AddNoun;
karbonátvíz AddNoun;
karmelitavíz AddNoun;
karsztvíz AddNoun;
kasztvíz AddNoun;
katonaész AddNoun;
kavicsvíz AddNoun;
kazánvíz AddNoun;
kecskevíz AddNoun;
kendervíz AddNoun;
keresztelővíz AddNoun;
keserűvíz AddNoun;
királylábvíz AddNoun;
királyvíz AddNoun;
kisvíz AddNoun;
klómész AddNoun;
klórvíz AddNoun;
kokszparázs AddNoun;
kondenzvíz AddNoun;
kopasztóvíz AddNoun;
kormánykéz AddNoun;
krezolvíz AddNoun;
krátervíz AddNoun;
kádvíz AddNoun;
kéz AddNoun;
kísértetkéz AddNoun;
kókuszvíz AddNoun;
köbmétervíz AddNoun;
költőlángész AddNoun;
könnyvíz AddNoun;
körtedarázs AddNoun;
közréz AddNoun;
középvíz AddNoun;
kürtősdarázs AddNoun;
kőszénparázs AddNoun;
lakájkéz AddNoun;
lecsapolóvíz AddNoun;
lemosóvíz AddNoun;
levesvíz AddNoun;
leánykéz AddNoun;
liliomkéz AddNoun;
lovagkéz AddNoun;
lábaskéz AddNoun;
lágyvíz AddNoun;
lángkéz AddNoun;
lánykéz AddNoun;
lávakéz AddNoun;
lótuszvíz AddNoun;
lökőkéz AddNoun;
magnéziummész AddNoun;
magánkéz AddNoun;
majomész AddNoun;
manókéz AddNoun;
maradékvíz AddNoun;
matrózkéz AddNoun;
medikuskéz AddNoun;
meggyvíz AddNoun;
mesterkéz AddNoun;
mocsárvíz AddNoun;
mosdóvíz AddNoun;
mostohakéz AddNoun;
mozdulatvíz AddNoun;
mustárdarázs AddNoun;
mágnesvíz AddNoun;
másodkéz AddNoun;
mélyvíz AddNoun;
mészvíz AddNoun;
mókusvíz AddNoun;
műdarázs AddNoun;
művészkéz AddNoun;
műásványvíz AddNoun;
nagylánykéz AddNoun;
napparázs AddNoun;
narancsvíz AddNoun;
negyedkéz AddNoun;
nullvíz AddNoun;
nyersréz AddNoun;
nyomdokvíz AddNoun;
nyírvíz AddNoun;
nátronmész AddNoun;
négerlábvíz AddNoun;
nősténydarázs AddNoun;
oltóvíz AddNoun;
operettárvíz AddNoun;
orvoskéz AddNoun;
osztrigamész AddNoun;
papírkéz AddNoun;
parasztész AddNoun;
patakvíz AddNoun;
pezsgővíz AddNoun;
pincevíz AddNoun;
pipaparázs AddNoun;
piszkoskéz AddNoun;
polgárkéz AddNoun;
portáskéz AddNoun;
posványvíz AddNoun;
primerhűtővíz AddNoun;
párolóvíz AddNoun;
pókkéz AddNoun;
pórusvíz AddNoun;
rabkéz AddNoun;
reaktorvíz AddNoun;
rekordárvíz AddNoun;
repcedarázs AddNoun;
robotkéz AddNoun;
rozmaringszájvíz AddNoun;
résvíz AddNoun;
réz AddNoun;
rónavíz AddNoun;
rózsagubacsdarázs AddNoun;
rózsavíz AddNoun;
rúdréz AddNoun;
salátavíz AddNoun;
sebvíz AddNoun;
segédkéz AddNoun;
sejtvíz AddNoun;
sintérkéz AddNoun;
sodorvíz AddNoun;
standardréz AddNoun;
szabadkéz AddNoun;
szakmunkásész AddNoun;
szaunavíz AddNoun;
szellemkéz AddNoun;
szemparázs AddNoun;
szennyvíz AddNoun;
szerelőkéz AddNoun;
szigetvíz AddNoun;
szikvíz AddNoun;
szivarparázs AddNoun;
szolgakéz AddNoun;
szulfitvíz AddNoun;
szállítóvíz AddNoun;
szénsavmész AddNoun;
színréz AddNoun;
szódavíz AddNoun;
szóróvíz AddNoun;
szökővíz AddNoun;
szükségvíz AddNoun;
szűrővíz AddNoun;
sárkánykéz AddNoun;
síkvíz AddNoun;
sósvíz AddNoun;
takarmánymész AddNoun;
talajbelvíz AddNoun;
tanárkéz AddNoun;
tarkaréz AddNoun;
tartalékvíz AddNoun;
teavíz AddNoun;
telekvíz AddNoun;
településiszennyvíz AddNoun;
tengerárvíz AddNoun;
termálvíz AddNoun;
termésréz AddNoun;
tetővíz AddNoun;
tisztítottszennyvíz AddNoun;
toalettvíz AddNoun;
tolvajkéz AddNoun;
torlaszvíz AddNoun;
torokvíz AddNoun;
triászvíz AddNoun;
tyúkész AddNoun;
táplálékvíz AddNoun;
tápvíz AddNoun;
társkéz AddNoun;
télvíz AddNoun;
tócsavíz AddNoun;
többletivóvíz AddNoun;
többletvíz AddNoun;
töltővíz AddNoun;
tömítővíz AddNoun;
túlfolyóvíz AddNoun;
tőrösdarázs AddNoun;
tűzkéz AddNoun;
tűzparázs AddNoun;
tűzzománckéz AddNoun;
uralkodókéz AddNoun;
vaddarázs AddNoun;
vadászkéz AddNoun;
varázskéz AddNoun;
varázsvíz AddNoun;
vaskéz AddNoun;
vezérkéz AddNoun;
virtuózkéz AddNoun;
visszamosóvíz AddNoun;
választóvíz AddNoun;
víz AddNoun;
zagyvíz AddNoun;
zsandárkéz AddNoun;
zsellérkéz AddNoun;
zuhanyozóvíz AddNoun;
zuhanyzóvíz AddNoun;
zárványvíz AddNoun;
ácskéz AddNoun;
állatész AddNoun;
állóvíz AddNoun;
áradmányvíz AddNoun;
árnyékkéz AddNoun;
árpavíz AddNoun;
ásványgyógyvíz AddNoun;
átfolyóvíz AddNoun;
áztatóvíz AddNoun;
élesztővíz AddNoun;
épületvíz AddNoun;
érvíz AddNoun;
ívóvíz AddNoun;
ólomdarázs AddNoun;
ónvíz AddNoun;
óriásfenyődarázs AddNoun;
ózonvíz AddNoun;
öblögetővíz AddNoun;
öntözővíz AddNoun;
ötvöskéz AddNoun;
úsztatóvíz AddNoun;
ügyvédkéz AddNoun;
üvegvíz AddNoun;
